Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3439
Review team; members; professional and administrative support.

(1) The suicide mortality review team shall consist of the following members: (a) The director; (b) a representative of the Nebraska Violent Death Reporting System; (c) a representative of Nebraska Local Outreach to Suicide Loss Survivors; and (d) a representative of the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.

(2) The director shall appoint the following individuals to be additional members of the suicide mortality review team: (a) An education administrator; (b) a hospital representative; (c) an emergency medical services representative; (d) a member of law enforcement; (e) a mental health professional or a licensed clinical social worker; (f) a veteran representative; and (g) additional members as needed.

(3) The department shall provide professional and administrative support to the review team.

Laws 2025, LB414, § 2.